Maryland, session 2025, SB0880.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
8–105.
(a) (1) There is a Governor’s Office for Children.
(2) The Office is a separate unit within the Executive Department.
(b) The purpose of the Office is to provide a coordinated, comprehensive,
interagency approach to promoting the well–being of children and families through a
network of supports, programs, and services that are family and child–oriented and
reducing the number of children living in poverty.
(c) The Governor may provide for the structure, duties, and responsibilities of the
Office by executive order.
(D) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER FOR EACH
OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2030, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $5,000,000 $250,000 TO THE
GOVERNOR’S OFFICE FOR CHILDREN TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO FUND OPERATING
EXPENSES OF THE BOYS AND GIRLS CLUBS OF MARYLAND.
– 1 –

Ch. 242 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –